South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S341.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (85) breast pumps, breast pump collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. (86) incontinence products. For purposes of this item, "incontinence products" means diapers or incontinence underpads on prescription by an enrolled State Medicaid provider for use by beneficiaries of the State Medicaid program when the provider is reimbursed by the State Medicaid program or a Medicaid-managed care organization. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----